Hawaii statutes.
§502-51 Exemption of instruments offered on
behalf of United States. In the case of any deed, lease, mortgage, lien,
notice, agreement, or other instrument offered for recordation by any judicial,
executive, or administrative officer of the United States, acting in the
officer's official capacity, or by any duly authorized officer or agent of any
agency or instrumentality of the United States created by or under federal or
state law, acting in the officer's or agent's official capacity, it shall not
be necessary that the instrument, where the instrument is required to be signed
by the officer or agent, be acknowledged before a notary public by the officer
or agent, and the registrar of conveyances shall accept the instrument for
recordation, when the signature of the duly authorized officer or agent,
together with the official seal, if any, is attached to the instrument for
recordation. [L 1923, c 167, §1; RL 1925, §3157; am L Sp 1933, c 36, §1; RL
1935, §5143; RL 1945, §12743; RL 1955, §343-35; HRS §502-51; gen ch 1985; am L
1993, c 141, §5]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next